Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2438
Major modification; applications; contents.

Each application for a major modification of an operating permit, a construction approval, a construction and operating permit, or a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or an application for a construction and operating permit or a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit shall contain (1) a certification that the information contained in the application is accurate to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief and that the applicant has the authority under the laws of the State of Nebraska to sign the application, (2) a detailed description of the major modification requested, (3) a completed nutrient management plan and supporting documentation unless such information has been previously submitted and is unchanged, and (4) such information as required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council.

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 18.